Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1006
Poultry; sales record; exceptions.

Whenever any chickens, ducks, geese, turkeys, or other domestic fowls or poultry, whether alive or dressed, shall be sold to any public buyer, a record of the same shall be taken by the purchaser, and signed by the seller. Such record shall be in a simple form, and for convenience may be made in book form in units of fifty or more, and a duplicate thereof made and furnished at the option of the parties. Such records shall provide for showing at least the number of birds or poultry purchased, and the kind or breed of poultry purchased, the name of the person or persons who raised the birds or poultry purchased, and if not raised by the seller, where he procured them. It is further provided that the wholesale dealer is exempt from the provisions of sections 69-1006 to 69-1008 upon purchase made by him from a retail dealer or a regular local agent, but not upon purchase made direct from a producer or an individual who procured the same from a producer. Regular local agents of a wholesaler, and retail dealers selling to the wholesaler, are likewise exempt from the provisions relating to the selling of poultry.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 6, p. 1280.